Washington statutes.
RCW 23.100.0621

Right of director or committee member to information.

A director or a member of a committee appointed under RCW 23.100.0617 may obtain, inspect, and copy all information regarding the state of activities and financial condition of the limited cooperative association and other information regarding the activities of the association if the information is reasonably related to the performance of the director's duties as director or the committee member's duties as a member of the committee. Information obtained in accordance with this section may not be used in any manner that would violate any duty of or to the association.

[ 2019 c 37 s 621.]